Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-102.01
University of Nebraska; composition.

The University of Nebraska shall be composed of a chief governing administrative unit, four universities which shall be the University of Nebraska-Lincoln, the University of Nebraska at Omaha, the University of Nebraska at Kearney, and the University of Nebraska Medical Center, and such other institutions and units as may be designated by the Legislature.

Laws 1973, LB 149, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 247, § 18.